Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201458-842
Bond issuance; resolution; provisions enumerated.

Any resolution or resolutions authorizing any bonds or any issue of bonds and any trust indenture
securing any bonds or any issue of bonds may contain provisions,
which shall be a part of the contract with the holders of the bonds to be
authorized, as to (1) pledging or assigning the revenue of the project or
loan with respect to which such bonds are to be issued or the revenue of any
other property, facilities, or loans, (2) the rentals, fees, loan payments, and other amounts to be charged,
the amounts to be raised in each year thereby, and the use and disposition
of such amounts, (3) the setting aside of reserves or sinking funds, and the
regulation, investment, and disposition thereof, (4) limitations on the use
of the project, (5) limitations on the purpose to which or the investments
in which the proceeds of sale of any issue of bonds then or thereafter to
be issued may be applied and pledging such proceeds to secure the payment
of the bonds or any issue of the bonds, (6) limitations on the issuance of
additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and
secured, and the refunding of outstanding bonds, (7) the procedure, if any,
by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated,
the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner
in which such consent may be given, (8) limitations on the amount of money
derived from the project or loan to be expended for operating, administrative,
or other expenses of the authority, (9) defining the acts or omissions to
act which shall constitute a default in the duties of the authority to holders
of its obligations and providing the rights and remedies of such holders in
the event of a default, (10) the mortgaging of a project and the site thereof
or any other property for the purpose of securing the bondholders, and (11)
any other matters relating to the bonds which the authority deems desirable.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 39;

Laws 1983, LB 159, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2939;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 39;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1739;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 42.